Arkansas, session 2025, HB1532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 8, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 12 — Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council

20-8-1201. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) A rare disease, sometimes called an orphan disease, is
defined as a disease that affects fewer than two hundred thousand (200,000)
people in the United States;
(2) There are more than ten thousand (10,000) known rare
diseases affecting more than thirty million (30,000,000) Americans with more
than half of this number being children;
(3) Approximately ninety-five percent (95%) of rare diseases do
not have a United States Food and Drug Administration approved treatment;
(4) While the exact cause for many rare diseases remains
unknown, many rare diseases are genetic in origin and can be linked to
mutations in a single gene or in multiple genes that can be passed down from
generation to generation;
*JMB357*
02/19/2025 10:15:04 AM JMB357

HB1532
(5) People with rare diseases face many obstacles, including
delays in obtaining an accurate diagnosis, finding a healthcare provider with
expertise in their condition, and a lack of affordable access to therapies
and medication used to treat rare diseases that may result in significant
physical, mental, and financial challenges; and
(6) A state-based advisory council composed of qualified
professionals and persons living with rare diseases and their caregivers
could educate or advise medical professionals, government agencies,
legislators, and the public about rare diseases as an important public health
issue to encourage research or support the development of new and better
policies to diagnose and treat rare diseases.

20-8-1202. Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council — Creation —
Membership.
(a) There is created the Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council within
the Department of Health, to consist of the following eight (8) members:
(1) A representative from an academic research institution in
the state that receives grant funding for rare disease research;
(2) A representative from the Department of Human Services who
is knowledgeable about the Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(3) A geneticist or genetic counselor, appointed by the
Secretary of the Department of Health;
(4) At least two (2) patients who have a rare disease, appointed
by the secretary;
(5) At least one (1) caregiver of a person with a rare disease,
appointed by the secretary;
(6) A person who is a member of the scientific community, a
member of the biopharmaceutical industry, or a pharmacist who has experience
with or is engaged in rare disease research, including without limitation a
medical researcher with experience conducting research on rare diseases,
appointed by the secretary; and
(7) A mental health provider, registered nurse, advanced
practice registered nurse, or physician with experience treating patients who
have rare diseases in this state, appointed by the secretary.
(b)(1) All members of the advisory council shall be full-time
residents of this state.
02/19/2025 10:15:04 AM JMB357

HB1532
(2) The membership of the council shall include a diverse set of
stakeholders representative of the geographic and population diversity of the
state.
(c)(1) The secretary shall appoint the Chair of the Arkansas Rare
Disease Advisory Council for an initial term of three (3) years.
(2) The chair shall not hold a position within the state
government.
(3) At the end of the initial three (3) year term, and every two
(2) years thereafter, the members of the council shall appoint, by a majority
vote, a new chair.
(d)(1) Members shall serve no longer than three (3) years.
(2) However, during the initial five (5) years after the
establishment of the council, members may serve up to four (4) years.
(e) If a vacancy occurs, the secretary shall fill the vacancy in a
timely manner and based on the requirements under subsection (a) of this
section.
(f)(1) The initial meeting of the council shall occur within the first
ninety (90) days after the effective date of this section.
(2) During the first year after the effective date of this
section, the council shall meet no less than one (1) time per month for a
time period determined by the chair either in person or via an online meeting
platform.
(3) After the first year after the effective date of this
section, the council shall meet no less than one (1) time per quarter either
in person or via an online meeting platform as determined by the chair.

20-8-1203. Powers and duties.
The Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council shall:
(1) Provide guidance and recommendations to educate the public,
the General Assembly, and other government agencies and departments on the
needs of individuals with rare diseases living in this state;
(2) Convene public hearings, make inquiries, and solicit
comments from the general public in this state to assist the Arkansas Rare
Disease Advisory Council with a first-year landscape or survey of the needs
of rare disease patients, caregivers, and providers in the state;
(3) Provide testimony and comments on pending legislation and
02/19/2025 10:15:04 AM JMB357

HB1532
rules before the General Assembly, or the Legislative Council when not in a
legislative session, and other state agencies that impact the rare disease
community in this state;
(4) Consult with experts on rare diseases to develop policy
recommendations to improve patient access to, and the quality of, rare
disease specialists, affordable and comprehensive healthcare coverage,
relevant diagnostics, timely treatment, and other needed services;
(5) Research and make recommendations to state agencies and
insurers that provide services to persons with a rare disease on the impact
of orphan drug pricing, prior authorization, cost-sharing, or other barriers
to the provision of treatment and care for patients;
(6) Establish best practices and protocols to include in state
planning related to natural disasters, public health emergencies, or other
emergency declarations to enable continuity of care for rare disease patients
and ensure safeguards against discrimination for rare disease patients are in
place;
(7) Evaluate and make recommendations to improve the Arkansas
Medicaid Program and state-regulated private health insurance coverage of
drugs for rare disease patients to improve coverage of diagnostics and
facilitate access to necessary healthcare providers with expertise in the
treatment of rare diseases;
(8) Publish a list of existing, publicly accessible resources on
research, diagnosis, treatment, and education relating to the rare diseases
on the website of the Department of Health;
(9) Identify areas of unmet need for research and opportunities
for collaboration across stakeholders and other state rare disease advisory
councils that can inform future studies and work done by the Arkansas Rare
Disease Advisory Council;
(10) Identify and distribute educational resources for
healthcare providers to foster recognition and optimize treatment of rare
diseases in this state;
(11) Research and identify best practices to reduce health
disparities and achieve health equity in the research, diagnosis, and
treatment of rare diseases in this state; and
(12) Provide opportunities for the public to hear updates and
provide input into the work of the Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council.
02/19/2025 10:15:04 AM JMB357

HB1532

20-8-1204. Reports.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council shall submit a
report to the Governor and the Legislative Council within one (1) year of
enactment of the Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council and annually
thereafter.
(2) Before submission of the report under subdivision (a)(1) of
this section, a draft of the report shall be made available for public
comment and discussed at an open public meeting.
(b) The report under subsection (a) of this section shall:
(1) Describe the activities and progress of the Arkansas Rare
Disease Advisory Council;
(2) Provide an update on the status of funding of the Arkansas
Rare Disease Advisory Council, including without limitation the grants that
were sought out, accepted, or used, and the remaining balance of funds of the
Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council; and
(3) Provide recommendations to the Governor and the General
Assembly on ways to address the needs of people living with rare diseases in
this state.

20-8-1205. Funding.
(a) The members of the Arkansas Rare Disease Advisory Council may
solicit funds on behalf of the council.
(b) The council shall:
(1) Set up a method to securely hold and distribute funds to
support the functioning of the council; and
(2) Report funding sources in report required under § 20-8-1203.









02/19/2025 10:15:04 AM JMB357